Utah statutes.
16-10a-1608.   Statement of person named as director or officer.

(1)  Any person named as a director or officer of a domestic or foreign corporation in an annual report or other document on file with the division may, if he does not hold the named position, deliver to the division for filing a statement setting forth:

(a)  his name;

(b)  the domestic or foreign corporation's name;

(c)  information sufficient to identify the report or other document in which he is named as a director or officer; and

(d)  the date on which he ceased to be a director or officer of the domestic or foreign corporation, or a statement that he did not hold the position for which he was named in the corporate report or other document.



Enacted by Chapter 277, 1992 General Session

